Illinois, session 104th, SB1777.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Banking Act is amended by changing 5Section 48.1 as follows: 6    (205 ILCS 5/48.1)  (from Ch. 17, par. 360)7    Sec. 48.1. Customer financial records; confidentiality. 8    (a) For the purpose of this Section, the term "financial 9records" means any original, any copy, or any summary of:10        (1) a document granting signature authority over a 11    deposit or account;12        (2) a statement, ledger card or other record on any 13    deposit or account, which shows each transaction in or 14    with respect to that account;15        (3) a check, draft or money order drawn on a bank or 16    issued and payable by a bank; or17        (4) any other item containing information pertaining 18    to any relationship established in the ordinary course of 19    a bank's business between a bank and its customer, 20    including financial statements or other financial 21    information provided by the customer.22    (b) This Section does not prohibit:23        (1) The preparation, examination, handling or   SB1777 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 09558 JRC 19621 b1    maintenance of any financial records by any officer, 2    employee or agent of a bank having custody of the records, 3    or the examination of the records by a certified public 4    accountant engaged by the bank to perform an independent 5    audit.6        (2) The examination of any financial records by, or 7    the furnishing of financial records by a bank to, any 8    officer, employee or agent of (i) the Commissioner of 9    Banks and Real Estate, (ii) after May 31, 1997, a state 10    regulatory authority authorized to examine a branch of a 11    State bank located in another state, (iii) the Comptroller 12    of the Currency, (iv) the Federal Reserve Board, or (v) 13    the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation for use solely 14    in the exercise of his duties as an officer, employee, or 15    agent.16        (3) The publication of data furnished from financial 17    records relating to customers where the data cannot be 18    identified to any particular customer or account.19        (4) The making of reports or returns required under 20    Chapter 61 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986.21        (5) Furnishing information concerning the dishonor of 22    any negotiable instrument permitted to be disclosed under 23    the Uniform Commercial Code.24        (6) The exchange in the regular course of business of 25    (i) credit information between a bank and other banks or 26    financial institutions or commercial enterprises, directly   SB1777 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 09558 JRC 19621 b1    or through a consumer reporting agency or (ii) financial 2    records or information derived from financial records 3    between a bank and other banks or financial institutions 4    or commercial enterprises for the purpose of conducting 5    due diligence pursuant to a purchase or sale involving the 6    bank or assets or liabilities of the bank.7        (7) The furnishing of information to the appropriate 8    law enforcement authorities where the bank reasonably 9    believes it has been the victim of a crime.10        (8) The furnishing of information under the Revised 11    Uniform Unclaimed Property Act.12        (9) The furnishing of information under the Illinois 13    Income Tax Act and the Illinois Estate and 14    Generation-Skipping Transfer Tax Act.15        (10) The furnishing of information under the federal 16    Currency and Foreign Transactions Reporting Act Title 31, 17    United States Code, Section 1051 et seq.18        (11) The furnishing of information under any other 19    statute that by its terms or by regulations promulgated 20    thereunder requires the disclosure of financial records 21    other than by subpoena, summons, warrant, or court order.22        (12) The furnishing of information about the existence 23    of an account of a person to a judgment creditor of that 24    person who has made a written request for that 25    information.26        (13) The exchange in the regular course of business of   SB1777 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 09558 JRC 19621 b1    information between commonly owned banks in connection 2    with a transaction authorized under paragraph (23) of 3    Section 5 and conducted at an affiliate facility.4        (14) The furnishing of information in accordance with 5    the federal Personal Responsibility and Work Opportunity 6    Reconciliation Act of 1996. Any bank governed by this Act 7    shall enter into an agreement for data exchanges with a 8    State agency provided the State agency pays to the bank a 9    reasonable fee not to exceed its actual cost incurred. A 10    bank providing information in accordance with this item 11    shall not be liable to any account holder or other person 12    for any disclosure of information to a State agency, for 13    encumbering or surrendering any assets held by the bank in 14    response to a lien or order to withhold and deliver issued 15    by a State agency, or for any other action taken pursuant 16    to this item, including individual or mechanical errors, 17    provided the action does not constitute gross negligence 18    or willful misconduct. A bank shall have no obligation to 19    hold, encumber, or surrender assets until it has been 20    served with a subpoena, summons, warrant, court or 21    administrative order, lien, or levy.22        (15) The exchange in the regular course of business of 23    information between a bank and any commonly owned 24    affiliate of the bank, subject to the provisions of the 25    Financial Institutions Insurance Sales Law.26        (16) The furnishing of information to law enforcement   SB1777 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 09558 JRC 19621 b1    authorities, the Illinois Department on Aging and its 2    regional administrative and provider agencies, the 3    Department of Human Services Office of Inspector General, 4    or public guardians: (i) upon subpoena by the 5    investigatory entity or the guardian, or (ii) if there is 6    suspicion by the bank that a customer who is an elderly 7    person or person with a disability has been or may become 8    the victim of financial exploitation. For the purposes of 9    this item (16), the term: (i) "elderly person" means a 10    person who is 60 or more years of age, (ii) "disabled 11    person" means a person who has or reasonably appears to 12    the bank to have a physical or mental disability that 13    impairs his or her ability to seek or obtain protection 14    from or prevent financial exploitation, and (iii) 15    "financial exploitation" means tortious or illegal use of 16    the assets or resources of an elderly or disabled person, 17    and includes, without limitation, misappropriation of the 18    elderly or disabled person's assets or resources by undue 19    influence, breach of fiduciary relationship, intimidation, 20    fraud, deception, extortion, or the use of assets or 21    resources in any manner contrary to law. A bank or person 22    furnishing information pursuant to this item (16) shall be 23    entitled to the same rights and protections as a person 24    furnishing information under the Adult Protective Services 25    Act and the Illinois Domestic Violence Act of 1986.26        (17) The disclosure of financial records or   SB1777 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 09558 JRC 19621 b1    information as necessary to effect, administer, or enforce 2    a transaction requested or authorized by the customer, or 3    in connection with:4            (A) servicing or processing a financial product or 5        service requested or authorized by the customer;6            (B) maintaining or servicing a customer's account 7        with the bank; or8            (C) a proposed or actual securitization or 9        secondary market sale (including sales of servicing 10        rights) related to a transaction of a customer.11        Nothing in this item (17), however, authorizes the 12    sale of the financial records or information of a customer 13    without the consent of the customer.14        (18) The disclosure of financial records or 15    information as necessary to protect against actual or 16    potential fraud, unauthorized transactions, claims, or 17    other liability.18        (19)(A) The disclosure of financial records or 19    information related to a private label credit program 20    between a financial institution and a private label party 21    in connection with that private label credit program. Such 22    information is limited to outstanding balance, available 23    credit, payment and performance and account history, 24    product references, purchase information, and information 25    related to the identity of the customer.26        (B)(1) For purposes of this paragraph (19) of   SB1777 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 09558 JRC 19621 b1    subsection (b) of Section 48.1, a "private label credit 2    program" means a credit program involving a financial 3    institution and a private label party that is used by a 4    customer of the financial institution and the private 5    label party primarily for payment for goods or services 6    sold, manufactured, or distributed by a private label 7    party. 8        (2) For purposes of this paragraph (19) of subsection 9    (b) of Section 48.1, a "private label party" means, with 10    respect to a private label credit program, any of the 11    following: a retailer, a merchant, a manufacturer, a trade 12    group, or any such person's affiliate, subsidiary, member, 13    agent, or service provider. 14        (20)(A) The furnishing of financial records of a 15    customer to the Department to aid the Department's initial 16    determination or subsequent re-determination of the 17    customer's eligibility for Medicaid and Medicaid long-term 18    care benefits for long-term care services, provided that 19    the bank receives the written consent and authorization of 20    the customer, which shall:21            (1) have the customer's signature notarized;22            (2) be signed by at least one witness who 23        certifies that he or she believes the customer to be of 24        sound mind and memory;25            (3) be tendered to the bank at the earliest 26        practicable time following its execution,   SB1777 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 09558 JRC 19621 b1        certification, and notarization;2            (4) specifically limit the disclosure of the 3        customer's financial records to the Department; and4            (5) be in substantially the following form:  5CUSTOMER CONSENT AND AUTHORIZATION 6FOR RELEASE OF FINANCIAL RECORDS  7I, ......................................., hereby authorize 8       (Name of Customer)  9............................................................. 10(Name of Financial Institution) 11............................................................. 12(Address of Financial Institution) 13to disclose the following financial records: 14any and all information concerning my deposit, savings, money 15market, certificate of deposit, individual retirement, 16retirement plan, 401(k) plan, incentive plan, employee benefit 17plan, mutual fund and loan accounts (including, but not 18limited to, any indebtedness or obligation for which I am a 19co-borrower, co-obligor, guarantor, or surety), and any and 20all other accounts in which I have an interest and any other   SB1777 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 09558 JRC 19621 b1information regarding me in the possession of the Financial 2Institution, 3to the Illinois Department of Human Services or the Illinois 4Department of Healthcare and Family Services, or both ("the 5Department"), for the following purpose(s):  6to aid in the initial determination or re-determination by the 7State of Illinois of my eligibility for Medicaid long-term 8care benefits, pursuant to applicable law.  9I understand that this Consent and Authorization may be 10revoked by me in writing at any time before my financial 11records, as described above, are disclosed, and that this 12Consent and Authorization is valid until the Financial 13Institution receives my written revocation. This Consent and 14Authorization shall constitute valid authorization for the 15Department identified above to inspect all such financial 16records set forth above, and to request and receive copies of 17such financial records from the Financial Institution (subject 18to such records search and reproduction reimbursement policies 19as the Financial Institution may have in place). An executed 20copy of this Consent and Authorization shall be sufficient and 21as good as the original and permission is hereby granted to 22honor a photostatic or electronic copy of this Consent and 23Authorization. Disclosure is strictly limited to the   SB1777 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 09558 JRC 19621 b1Department identified above and no other person or entity 2shall receive my financial records pursuant to this Consent 3and Authorization. By signing this form, I agree to indemnify 4and hold the Financial Institution harmless from any and all 5claims, demands, and losses, including reasonable attorneys 6fees and expenses, arising from or incurred in its reliance on 7this Consent and Authorization. As used herein, "Customer" 8shall mean "Member" if the Financial Institution is a credit 9union. 10....................... ...................... 11(Date)                  (Signature of Customer)              12                         ...................... 13                         ...................... 14                         (Address of Customer)  15                         ...................... 16                         (Customer's birth date) 17                         (month/day/year)  18The undersigned witness certifies that ................., 19known to me to be the same person whose name is subscribed as 20the customer to the foregoing Consent and Authorization, 21appeared before me and the notary public and acknowledged 22signing and delivering the instrument as his or her free and   SB1777 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 09558 JRC 19621 b1voluntary act for the uses and purposes therein set forth. I 2believe him or her to be of sound mind and memory. The 3undersigned witness also certifies that the witness is not an 4owner, operator, or relative of an owner or operator of a 5long-term care facility in which the customer is a patient or 6resident.  7Dated: ................. ...................... 8                         (Signature of Witness)  9                         ...................... 10                         (Print Name of Witness)  11                         ...................... 12                         ...................... 13                         (Address of Witness)  14State of Illinois)15                 ) ss.16County of .......) 17The undersigned, a notary public in and for the above county 18and state, certifies that .........., known to me to be the 19same person whose name is subscribed as the customer to the 20foregoing Consent and Authorization, appeared before me 21together with the witness, .........., in person and   SB1777 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 09558 JRC 19621 b1acknowledged signing and delivering the instrument as the free 2and voluntary act of the customer for the uses and purposes 3therein set forth.  4Dated:....................................................... 5Notary Public:............................................... 6My commission expires:.......................................  7        (B) In no event shall the bank distribute the 8    customer's financial records to the long-term care 9    facility from which the customer seeks initial or 10    continuing residency or long-term care services.11        (C) A bank providing financial records of a customer 12    in good faith relying on a consent and authorization 13    executed and tendered in accordance with this paragraph 14    (20) shall not be liable to the customer or any other 15    person in relation to the bank's disclosure of the 16    customer's financial records to the Department. The 17    customer signing the consent and authorization shall 18    indemnify and hold the bank harmless that relies in good 19    faith upon the consent and authorization and incurs a loss 20    because of such reliance. The bank recovering under this 21    indemnification provision shall also be entitled to 22    reasonable attorney's fees and the expenses of recovery.23        (D) A bank shall be reimbursed by the customer for all 24    costs reasonably necessary and directly incurred in   SB1777 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 09558 JRC 19621 b1    searching for, reproducing, and disclosing a customer's 2    financial records required or requested to be produced 3    pursuant to any consent and authorization executed under 4    this paragraph (20). The requested financial records shall 5    be delivered to the Department within 10 days after 6    receiving a properly executed consent and authorization or 7    at the earliest practicable time thereafter if the 8    requested records cannot be delivered within 10 days, but 9    delivery may be delayed until the final reimbursement of 10    all costs is received by the bank. The bank may honor a 11    photostatic or electronic copy of a properly executed 12    consent and authorization.13        (E) Nothing in this paragraph (20) shall impair, 14    abridge, or abrogate the right of a customer to:15            (1) directly disclose his or her financial records 16        to the Department or any other person; or17            (2) authorize his or her attorney or duly 18        appointed agent to request and obtain the customer's 19        financial records and disclose those financial records 20        to the Department.21        (F) For purposes of this paragraph (20), "Department" 22    means the Department of Human Services and the Department 23    of Healthcare and Family Services or any successor 24    administrative agency of either agency.25        (21) The furnishing of financial information to the 26    executor, executrix, administrator, or other lawful   SB1777 Enrolled- 14 -LRB104 09558 JRC 19621 b1    representative of the estate of a customer. 2    (c) Except as otherwise provided by this Act, a bank may 3not disclose to any person, except to the customer or his duly 4authorized agent, any financial records or financial 5information obtained from financial records relating to that 6customer of that bank unless:7        (1) the customer has authorized disclosure to the 8    person;9        (2) the financial records are disclosed in response to 10    a lawful subpoena, summons, warrant, citation to discover 11    assets, or court order which meets the requirements of 12    subsection (d) of this Section; or13        (3) the bank is attempting to collect an obligation 14    owed to the bank and the bank complies with the provisions 15    of Section 2I of the Consumer Fraud and Deceptive Business 16    Practices Act.17    (d) A bank shall disclose financial records under 18paragraph (2) of subsection (c) of this Section under a lawful 19subpoena, summons, warrant, citation to discover assets, or 20court order only after the bank sends a copy of the subpoena, 21summons, warrant, citation to discover assets, or court order 22to the person establishing the relationship with the bank, if 23living, and, otherwise the person's personal representative, 24if known, at the person's last known address by first class 25mail, postage prepaid, through a third-party commercial 26carrier or courier with delivery charge fully prepaid, by hand   SB1777 Enrolled- 15 -LRB104 09558 JRC 19621 b1delivery, or by electronic delivery at an email address on 2file with the bank (if the person establishing the 3relationship with the bank has consented to receive electronic 4delivery and, if the person establishing the relationship with 5the bank is a consumer, the person has consented under the 6consumer consent provisions set forth in Section 7001 of Title 715 of the United States Code), unless the bank is specifically 8prohibited from notifying the person by order of court or by 9applicable State or federal law. A bank shall not mail a copy 10of a subpoena to any person pursuant to this subsection if the 11subpoena was issued by a grand jury under the Statewide Grand 12Jury Act.13    (e) Any officer or employee of a bank who knowingly and 14willfully furnishes financial records in violation of this 15Section is guilty of a business offense and, upon conviction, 16shall be fined not more than $1,000.17    (f) Any person who knowingly and willfully induces or 18attempts to induce any officer or employee of a bank to 19disclose financial records in violation of this Section is 20guilty of a business offense and, upon conviction, shall be 21fined not more than $1,000.22    (g) A bank shall be reimbursed for costs that are 23reasonably necessary and that have been directly incurred in 24searching for, reproducing, or transporting books, papers, 25records, or other data required or requested to be produced 26pursuant to a lawful subpoena, summons, warrant, citation to   SB1777 Enrolled- 16 -LRB104 09558 JRC 19621 b1discover assets, or court order. The Commissioner shall 2determine the rates and conditions under which payment may be 3made.4(Source: P.A. 101-81, eff. 7-12-19; 102-873, eff. 5-13-22.) 5    Section 10. The Savings Bank Act is amended by changing 6Section 4013 as follows: 7    (205 ILCS 205/4013)  (from Ch. 17, par. 7304-13)8    Sec. 4013. Access to books and records; communication with 9members and shareholders.10    (a) Every member or shareholder shall have the right to 11inspect books and records of the savings bank that pertain to 12his accounts. Otherwise, the right of inspection and 13examination of the books and records shall be limited as 14provided in this Act, and no other person shall have access to 15the books and records nor shall be entitled to a list of the 16members or shareholders.17    (b) For the purpose of this Section, the term "financial 18records" means any original, any copy, or any summary of (1) a 19document granting signature authority over a deposit or 20account; (2) a statement, ledger card, or other record on any 21deposit or account that shows each transaction in or with 22respect to that account; (3) a check, draft, or money order 23drawn on a savings bank or issued and payable by a savings 24bank; or (4) any other item containing information pertaining   SB1777 Enrolled- 17 -LRB104 09558 JRC 19621 b1to any relationship established in the ordinary course of a 2savings bank's business between a savings bank and its 3customer, including financial statements or other financial 4information provided by the member or shareholder.5    (c) This Section does not prohibit:6        (1) The preparation, examination, handling, or 7    maintenance of any financial records by any officer, 8    employee, or agent of a savings bank having custody of 9    records or examination of records by a certified public 10    accountant engaged by the savings bank to perform an 11    independent audit.12        (2) The examination of any financial records by, or 13    the furnishing of financial records by a savings bank to, 14    any officer, employee, or agent of the Commissioner of 15    Banks and Real Estate or the federal depository 16    institution regulator for use solely in the exercise of 17    his duties as an officer, employee, or agent.18        (3) The publication of data furnished from financial 19    records relating to members or holders of capital where 20    the data cannot be identified to any particular member, 21    shareholder, or account.22        (4) The making of reports or returns required under 23    Chapter 61 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986.24        (5) Furnishing information concerning the dishonor of 25    any negotiable instrument permitted to be disclosed under 26    the Uniform Commercial Code.  SB1777 Enrolled- 18 -LRB104 09558 JRC 19621 b1        (6) The exchange in the regular course of business of 2    (i) credit information between a savings bank and other 3    savings banks or financial institutions or commercial 4    enterprises, directly or through a consumer reporting 5    agency or (ii) financial records or information derived 6    from financial records between a savings bank and other 7    savings banks or financial institutions or commercial 8    enterprises for the purpose of conducting due diligence 9    pursuant to a purchase or sale involving the savings bank 10    or assets or liabilities of the savings bank.11        (7) The furnishing of information to the appropriate 12    law enforcement authorities where the savings bank 13    reasonably believes it has been the victim of a crime.14        (8) The furnishing of information pursuant to the 15    Revised Uniform Unclaimed Property Act.16        (9) The furnishing of information pursuant to the 17    Illinois Income Tax Act and the Illinois Estate and 18    Generation-Skipping Transfer Tax Act.19        (10) The furnishing of information pursuant to the 20    federal Currency and Foreign Transactions Reporting Act, 21    (Title 31, United States Code, Section 1051 et seq.).22        (11) The furnishing of information pursuant to any 23    other statute which by its terms or by regulations 24    promulgated thereunder requires the disclosure of 25    financial records other than by subpoena, summons, 26    warrant, or court order.  SB1777 Enrolled- 19 -LRB104 09558 JRC 19621 b1        (12) The furnishing of information in accordance with 2    the federal Personal Responsibility and Work Opportunity 3    Reconciliation Act of 1996. Any savings bank governed by 4    this Act shall enter into an agreement for data exchanges 5    with a State agency provided the State agency pays to the 6    savings bank a reasonable fee not to exceed its actual 7    cost incurred. A savings bank providing information in 8    accordance with this item shall not be liable to any 9    account holder or other person for any disclosure of 10    information to a State agency, for encumbering or 11    surrendering any assets held by the savings bank in 12    response to a lien or order to withhold and deliver issued 13    by a State agency, or for any other action taken pursuant 14    to this item, including individual or mechanical errors, 15    provided the action does not constitute gross negligence 16    or willful misconduct. A savings bank shall have no 17    obligation to hold, encumber, or surrender assets until it 18    has been served with a subpoena, summons, warrant, court 19    or administrative order, lien, or levy.20        (13) The furnishing of information to law enforcement 21    authorities, the Illinois Department on Aging and its 22    regional administrative and provider agencies, the 23    Department of Human Services Office of Inspector General, 24    or public guardians: (i) upon subpoena by the 25    investigatory entity or the guardian, or (ii) if there is 26    suspicion by the savings bank that a customer who is an   SB1777 Enrolled- 20 -LRB104 09558 JRC 19621 b1    elderly person or person with a disability has been or may 2    become the victim of financial exploitation. For the 3    purposes of this item (13), the term: (i) "elderly person" 4    means a person who is 60 or more years of age, (ii) "person 5    with a disability" means a person who has or reasonably 6    appears to the savings bank to have a physical or mental 7    disability that impairs his or her ability to seek or 8    obtain protection from or prevent financial exploitation, 9    and (iii) "financial exploitation" means tortious or 10    illegal use of the assets or resources of an elderly 11    person or person with a disability, and includes, without 12    limitation, misappropriation of the assets or resources of 13    the elderly person or person with a disability by undue 14    influence, breach of fiduciary relationship, intimidation, 15    fraud, deception, extortion, or the use of assets or 16    resources in any manner contrary to law. A savings bank or 17    person furnishing information pursuant to this item (13) 18    shall be entitled to the same rights and protections as a 19    person furnishing information under the Adult Protective 20    Services Act and the Illinois Domestic Violence Act of 21    1986.22        (14) The disclosure of financial records or 23    information as necessary to effect, administer, or enforce 24    a transaction requested or authorized by the member or 25    holder of capital, or in connection with:26            (A) servicing or processing a financial product or   SB1777 Enrolled- 21 -LRB104 09558 JRC 19621 b1        service requested or authorized by the member or 2        holder of capital;3            (B) maintaining or servicing an account of a 4        member or holder of capital with the savings bank; or5            (C) a proposed or actual securitization or 6        secondary market sale (including sales of servicing 7        rights) related to a transaction of a member or holder 8        of capital.9        Nothing in this item (14), however, authorizes the 10    sale of the financial records or information of a member 11    or holder of capital without the consent of the member or 12    holder of capital.13        (15) The exchange in the regular course of business of 14    information between a savings bank and any commonly owned 15    affiliate of the savings bank, subject to the provisions 16    of the Financial Institutions Insurance Sales Law.17        (16) The disclosure of financial records or 18    information as necessary to protect against or prevent 19    actual or potential fraud, unauthorized transactions, 20    claims, or other liability.21        (17)(a) The disclosure of financial records or 22    information related to a private label credit program 23    between a financial institution and a private label party 24    in connection with that private label credit program. Such 25    information is limited to outstanding balance, available 26    credit, payment and performance and account history,   SB1777 Enrolled- 22 -LRB104 09558 JRC 19621 b1    product references, purchase information, and information 2    related to the identity of the customer.3        (b)(1) For purposes of this paragraph (17) of 4    subsection (c) of Section 4013, a "private label credit 5    program" means a credit program involving a financial 6    institution and a private label party that is used by a 7    customer of the financial institution and the private 8    label party primarily for payment for goods or services 9    sold, manufactured, or distributed by a private label 10    party.11        (2) For purposes of this paragraph (17) of subsection 12    (c) of Section 4013, a "private label party" means, with 13    respect to a private label credit program, any of the 14    following: a retailer, a merchant, a manufacturer, a trade 15    group, or any such person's affiliate, subsidiary, member, 16    agent, or service provider.17        (18)(a) The furnishing of financial records of a 18    customer to the Department to aid the Department's initial 19    determination or subsequent re-determination of the 20    customer's eligibility for Medicaid and Medicaid long-term 21    care benefits for long-term care services, provided that 22    the savings bank receives the written consent and 23    authorization of the customer, which shall:24            (1) have the customer's signature notarized;25            (2) be signed by at least one witness who 26        certifies that he or she believes the customer to be of   SB1777 Enrolled- 23 -LRB104 09558 JRC 19621 b1        sound mind and memory;2            (3) be tendered to the savings bank at the 3        earliest practicable time following its execution, 4        certification, and notarization;5            (4) specifically limit the disclosure of the 6        customer's financial records to the Department; and7            (5) be in substantially the following form:  8CUSTOMER CONSENT AND AUTHORIZATION 9FOR RELEASE OF FINANCIAL RECORDS  10I, ......................................., hereby authorize 11       (Name of Customer)  12............................................................. 13(Name of Financial Institution) 14............................................................. 15(Address of Financial Institution) 16to disclose the following financial records: 17any and all information concerning my deposit, savings, money 18market, certificate of deposit, individual retirement, 19retirement plan, 401(k) plan, incentive plan, employee benefit 20plan, mutual fund and loan accounts (including, but not   SB1777 Enrolled- 24 -LRB104 09558 JRC 19621 b1limited to, any indebtedness or obligation for which I am a 2co-borrower, co-obligor, guarantor, or surety), and any and 3all other accounts in which I have an interest and any other 4information regarding me in the possession of the Financial 5Institution, 6to the Illinois Department of Human Services or the Illinois 7Department of Healthcare and Family Services, or both ("the 8Department"), for the following purpose(s): 9to aid in the initial determination or re-determination by the 10State of Illinois of my eligibility for Medicaid long-term 11care benefits, pursuant to applicable law.  12I understand that this Consent and Authorization may be 13revoked by me in writing at any time before my financial 14records, as described above, are disclosed, and that this 15Consent and Authorization is valid until the Financial 16Institution receives my written revocation. This Consent and 17Authorization shall constitute valid authorization for the 18Department identified above to inspect all such financial 19records set forth above, and to request and receive copies of 20such financial records from the Financial Institution (subject 21to such records search and reproduction reimbursement policies 22as the Financial Institution may have in place). An executed 23copy of this Consent and Authorization shall be sufficient and   SB1777 Enrolled- 25 -LRB104 09558 JRC 19621 b1as good as the original and permission is hereby granted to 2honor a photostatic or electronic copy of this Consent and 3Authorization. Disclosure is strictly limited to the 4Department identified above and no other person or entity 5shall receive my financial records pursuant to this Consent 6and Authorization. By signing this form, I agree to indemnify 7and hold the Financial Institution harmless from any and all 8claims, demands, and losses, including reasonable attorneys 9fees and expenses, arising from or incurred in its reliance on 10this Consent and Authorization. As used herein, "Customer" 11shall mean "Member" if the Financial Institution is a credit 12union. 13....................... ...................... 14(Date)                  (Signature of Customer)              15                         ...................... 16                         ...................... 17                         (Address of Customer)  18                         ...................... 19                         (Customer's birth date) 20                         (month/day/year)  21The undersigned witness certifies that ................., 22known to me to be the same person whose name is subscribed as   SB1777 Enrolled- 26 -LRB104 09558 JRC 19621 b1the customer to the foregoing Consent and Authorization, 2appeared before me and the notary public and acknowledged 3signing and delivering the instrument as his or her free and 4voluntary act for the uses and purposes therein set forth. I 5believe him or her to be of sound mind and memory. The 6undersigned witness also certifies that the witness is not an 7owner, operator, or relative of an owner or operator of a 8long-term care facility in which the customer is a patient or 9resident.  10Dated: ................. ...................... 11                         (Signature of Witness)  12                         ...................... 13                         (Print Name of Witness)  14                         ...................... 15                         ...................... 16                         (Address of Witness)  17State of Illinois)18                 ) ss.19County of .......) 20The undersigned, a notary public in and for the above county 21and state, certifies that .........., known to me to be the   SB1777 Enrolled- 27 -LRB104 09558 JRC 19621 b1same person whose name is subscribed as the customer to the 2foregoing Consent and Authorization, appeared before me 3together with the witness, .........., in person and 4acknowledged signing and delivering the instrument as the free 5and voluntary act of the customer for the uses and purposes 6therein set forth.  7Dated:....................................................... 8Notary Public:............................................... 9My commission expires:.......................................  10        (b) In no event shall the savings bank distribute the 11    customer's financial records to the long-term care 12    facility from which the customer seeks initial or 13    continuing residency or long-term care services.14        (c) A savings bank providing financial records of a 15    customer in good faith relying on a consent and 16    authorization executed and tendered in accordance with 17    this paragraph (18) shall not be liable to the customer or 18    any other person in relation to the savings bank's 19    disclosure of the customer's financial records to the 20    Department. The customer signing the consent and 21    authorization shall indemnify and hold the savings bank 22    harmless that relies in good faith upon the consent and 23    authorization and incurs a loss because of such reliance. 24    The savings bank recovering under this indemnification   SB1777 Enrolled- 28 -LRB104 09558 JRC 19621 b1    provision shall also be entitled to reasonable attorney's 2    fees and the expenses of recovery.3        (d) A savings bank shall be reimbursed by the customer 4    for all costs reasonably necessary and directly incurred 5    in searching for, reproducing, and disclosing a customer's 6    financial records required or requested to be produced 7    pursuant to any consent and authorization executed under 8    this paragraph (18). The requested financial records shall 9    be delivered to the Department within 10 days after 10    receiving a properly executed consent and authorization or 11    at the earliest practicable time thereafter if the 12    requested records cannot be delivered within 10 days, but 13    delivery may be delayed until the final reimbursement of 14    all costs is received by the savings bank. The savings 15    bank may honor a photostatic or electronic copy of a 16    properly executed consent and authorization.17        (e) Nothing in this paragraph (18) shall impair, 18    abridge, or abrogate the right of a customer to:19            (1) directly disclose his or her financial records 20        to the Department or any other person; or21            (2) authorize his or her attorney or duly 22        appointed agent to request and obtain the customer's 23        financial records and disclose those financial records 24        to the Department.25        (f) For purposes of this paragraph (18), "Department" 26    means the Department of Human Services and the Department   SB1777 Enrolled- 29 -LRB104 09558 JRC 19621 b1    of Healthcare and Family Services or any successor 2    administrative agency of either agency. 3        (19) The furnishing of financial information to the 4    executor, executrix, administrator, or other lawful 5    representative of the estate of a customer. 6    (d) A savings bank may not disclose to any person, except 7to the member or holder of capital or his duly authorized 8agent, any financial records relating to that member or 9shareholder of the savings bank unless:10        (1) the member or shareholder has authorized 11    disclosure to the person; or12        (2) the financial records are disclosed in response to 13    a lawful subpoena, summons, warrant, citation to discover 14    assets, or court order that meets the requirements of 15    subsection (e) of this Section.16    (e) A savings bank shall disclose financial records under 17subsection (d) of this Section pursuant to a lawful subpoena, 18summons, warrant, citation to discover assets, or court order 19only after the savings bank sends a copy of the subpoena, 20summons, warrant, citation to discover assets, or court order 21to the person establishing the relationship with the savings 22bank, if living, and otherwise, the person's personal 23representative, if known, at the person's last known address 24by first class mail, postage prepaid, through a third-party 25commercial carrier or courier with delivery charge fully 26prepaid, by hand delivery, or by electronic delivery at an   SB1777 Enrolled- 30 -LRB104 09558 JRC 19621 b1email address on file with the savings bank (if the person 2establishing the relationship with the savings bank has 3consented to receive electronic delivery and, if the person 4establishing the relationship with the savings bank is a 5consumer, the person has consented under the consumer consent 6provisions set forth in Section 7001 of Title 15 of the United 7States Code), unless the savings bank is specifically 8prohibited from notifying the person by order of court.9    (f) Any officer or employee of a savings bank who 10knowingly and willfully furnishes financial records in 11violation of this Section is guilty of a business offense and, 12upon conviction, shall be fined not more than $1,000.13    (g) Any person who knowingly and willfully induces or 14attempts to induce any officer or employee of a savings bank to 15disclose financial records in violation of this Section is 16guilty of a business offense and, upon conviction, shall be 17fined not more than $1,000.18    (h) If any member or shareholder desires to communicate 19with the other members or shareholders of the savings bank 20with reference to any question pending or to be presented at an 21annual or special meeting, the savings bank shall give that 22person, upon request, a statement of the approximate number of 23members or shareholders entitled to vote at the meeting and an 24estimate of the cost of preparing and mailing the 25communication. The requesting member shall submit the 26communication to the Commissioner who, upon finding it to be   SB1777 Enrolled- 31 -LRB104 09558 JRC 19621 b1appropriate and truthful, shall direct that it be prepared and 2mailed to the members upon the requesting member's or 3shareholder's payment or adequate provision for payment of the 4expenses of preparation and mailing.5    (i) A savings bank shall be reimbursed for costs that are 6necessary and that have been directly incurred in searching 7for, reproducing, or transporting books, papers, records, or 8other data of a customer required to be reproduced pursuant to 9a lawful subpoena, warrant, citation to discover assets, or 10court order.11    (j) Notwithstanding the provisions of this Section, a 12savings bank may sell or otherwise make use of lists of 13customers' names and addresses. All other information 14regarding a customer's account is subject to the disclosure 15provisions of this Section. At the request of any customer, 16that customer's name and address shall be deleted from any 17list that is to be sold or used in any other manner beyond 18identification of the customer's accounts.19(Source: P.A. 102-873, eff. 5-13-22.) 20    Section 15. The Illinois Credit Union Act is amended by 21changing Section 10 as follows: 22    (205 ILCS 305/10)  (from Ch. 17, par. 4411)23    Sec. 10. Credit union records; member financial records. 24    (1) A credit union shall establish and maintain books,   SB1777 Enrolled- 32 -LRB104 09558 JRC 19621 b1records, accounting systems and procedures which accurately 2reflect its operations and which enable the Department to 3readily ascertain the true financial condition of the credit 4union and whether it is complying with this Act.5    (2) A photostatic or photographic reproduction of any 6credit union records shall be admissible as evidence of 7transactions with the credit union. 8    (3)(a) For the purpose of this Section, the term 9"financial records" means any original, any copy, or any 10summary of (1) a document granting signature authority over an 11account, (2) a statement, ledger card or other record on any 12account which shows each transaction in or with respect to 13that account, (3) a check, draft or money order drawn on a 14financial institution or other entity or issued and payable by 15or through a financial institution or other entity, or (4) any 16other item containing information pertaining to any 17relationship established in the ordinary course of business 18between a credit union and its member, including financial 19statements or other financial information provided by the 20member. 21    (b) This Section does not prohibit:22        (1) The preparation, examination, handling or 23    maintenance of any financial records by any officer, 24    employee or agent of a credit union having custody of such 25    records, or the examination of such records by a certified 26    public accountant engaged by the credit union to perform   SB1777 Enrolled- 33 -LRB104 09558 JRC 19621 b1    an independent audit.2        (2) The examination of any financial records by or the 3    furnishing of financial records by a credit union to any 4    officer, employee or agent of the Department, the National 5    Credit Union Administration, Federal Reserve board or any 6    insurer of share accounts for use solely in the exercise 7    of his duties as an officer, employee or agent.8        (3) The publication of data furnished from financial 9    records relating to members where the data cannot be 10    identified to any particular customer of account.11        (4) The making of reports or returns required under 12    Chapter 61 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954.13        (5) Furnishing information concerning the dishonor of 14    any negotiable instrument permitted to be disclosed under 15    the Uniform Commercial Code.16        (6) The exchange in the regular course of business of 17    (i) credit information between a credit union and other 18    credit unions or financial institutions or commercial 19    enterprises, directly or through a consumer reporting 20    agency or (ii) financial records or information derived 21    from financial records between a credit union and other 22    credit unions or financial institutions or commercial 23    enterprises for the purpose of conducting due diligence 24    pursuant to a merger or a purchase or sale of assets or 25    liabilities of the credit union.26        (7) The furnishing of information to the appropriate   SB1777 Enrolled- 34 -LRB104 09558 JRC 19621 b1    law enforcement authorities where the credit union 2    reasonably believes it has been the victim of a crime.3        (8) The furnishing of information pursuant to the 4    Revised Uniform Unclaimed Property Act.5        (9) The furnishing of information pursuant to the 6    Illinois Income Tax Act and the Illinois Estate and 7    Generation-Skipping Transfer Tax Act.8        (10) The furnishing of information pursuant to the 9    federal Currency and Foreign Transactions Reporting Act, 10    Title 31, United States Code, Section 1051 et sequentia.11        (11) The furnishing of information pursuant to any 12    other statute which by its terms or by regulations 13    promulgated thereunder requires the disclosure of 14    financial records other than by subpoena, summons, warrant 15    or court order.16        (12) The furnishing of information in accordance with 17    the federal Personal Responsibility and Work Opportunity 18    Reconciliation Act of 1996. Any credit union governed by 19    this Act shall enter into an agreement for data exchanges 20    with a State agency provided the State agency pays to the 21    credit union a reasonable fee not to exceed its actual 22    cost incurred. A credit union providing information in 23    accordance with this item shall not be liable to any 24    account holder or other person for any disclosure of 25    information to a State agency, for encumbering or 26    surrendering any assets held by the credit union in   SB1777 Enrolled- 35 -LRB104 09558 JRC 19621 b1    response to a lien or order to withhold and deliver issued 2    by a State agency, or for any other action taken pursuant 3    to this item, including individual or mechanical errors, 4    provided the action does not constitute gross negligence 5    or willful misconduct. A credit union shall have no 6    obligation to hold, encumber, or surrender assets until it 7    has been served with a subpoena, summons, warrant, court 8    or administrative order, lien, or levy.9        (13) The furnishing of information to law enforcement 10    authorities, the Illinois Department on Aging and its 11    regional administrative and provider agencies, the 12    Department of Human Services Office of Inspector General, 13    or public guardians: (i) upon subpoena by the 14    investigatory entity or the guardian, or (ii) if there is 15    suspicion by the credit union that a member who is an 16    elderly person or person with a disability has been or may 17    become the victim of financial exploitation. For the 18    purposes of this item (13), the term: (i) "elderly person" 19    means a person who is 60 or more years of age, (ii) "person 20    with a disability" means a person who has or reasonably 21    appears to the credit union to have a physical or mental 22    disability that impairs his or her ability to seek or 23    obtain protection from or prevent financial exploitation, 24    and (iii) "financial exploitation" means tortious or 25    illegal use of the assets or resources of an elderly 26    person or person with a disability, and includes, without   SB1777 Enrolled- 36 -LRB104 09558 JRC 19621 b1    limitation, misappropriation of the elderly or disabled 2    person's assets or resources by undue influence, breach of 3    fiduciary relationship, intimidation, fraud, deception, 4    extortion, or the use of assets or resources in any manner 5    contrary to law. A credit union or person furnishing 6    information pursuant to this item (13) shall be entitled 7    to the same rights and protections as a person furnishing 8    information under the Adult Protective Services Act and 9    the Illinois Domestic Violence Act of 1986.10        (14) The disclosure of financial records or 11    information as necessary to effect, administer, or enforce 12    a transaction requested or authorized by the member, or in 13    connection with:14            (A) servicing or processing a financial product or 15        service requested or authorized by the member;16            (B) maintaining or servicing a member's account 17        with the credit union; or18            (C) a proposed or actual securitization or 19        secondary market sale (including sales of servicing 20        rights) related to a transaction of a member.21        Nothing in this item (14), however, authorizes the 22    sale of the financial records or information of a member 23    without the consent of the member.24        (15) The disclosure of financial records or 25    information as necessary to protect against or prevent 26    actual or potential fraud, unauthorized transactions,   SB1777 Enrolled- 37 -LRB104 09558 JRC 19621 b1    claims, or other liability.2        (16)(a) The disclosure of financial records or 3    information related to a private label credit program 4    between a financial institution and a private label party 5    in connection with that private label credit program. Such 6    information is limited to outstanding balance, available 7    credit, payment and performance and account history, 8    product references, purchase information, and information 9    related to the identity of the customer.10        (b)(1) For purposes of this item (16), "private label 11    credit program" means a credit program involving a 12    financial institution and a private label party that is 13    used by a customer of the financial institution and the 14    private label party primarily for payment for goods or 15    services sold, manufactured, or distributed by a private 16    label party.17        (2) For purposes of this item (16), "private label 18    party" means, with respect to a private label credit 19    program, any of the following: a retailer, a merchant, a 20    manufacturer, a trade group, or any such person's 21    affiliate, subsidiary, member, agent, or service provider.22        (17)(a) The furnishing of financial records of a 23    member to the Department to aid the Department's initial 24    determination or subsequent re-determination of the 25    member's eligibility for Medicaid and Medicaid long-term 26    care benefits for long-term care services, provided that   SB1777 Enrolled- 38 -LRB104 09558 JRC 19621 b1    the credit union receives the written consent and 2    authorization of the member, which shall:3            (1) have the member's signature notarized;4            (2) be signed by at least one witness who 5        certifies that he or she believes the member to be of 6        sound mind and memory;7            (3) be tendered to the credit union at the 8        earliest practicable time following its execution, 9        certification, and notarization;10            (4) specifically limit the disclosure of the 11        member's financial records to the Department; and12            (5) be in substantially the following form:  13CUSTOMER CONSENT AND AUTHORIZATION 14FOR RELEASE OF FINANCIAL RECORDS  15I, ......................................., hereby authorize 16       (Name of Customer)  17............................................................. 18(Name of Financial Institution) 19............................................................. 20(Address of Financial Institution) 21to disclose the following financial records:   SB1777 Enrolled- 39 -LRB104 09558 JRC 19621 b1any and all information concerning my deposit, savings, money 2market, certificate of deposit, individual retirement, 3retirement plan, 401(k) plan, incentive plan, employee benefit 4plan, mutual fund and loan accounts (including, but not 5limited to, any indebtedness or obligation for which I am a 6co-borrower, co-obligor, guarantor, or surety), and any and 7all other accounts in which I have an interest and any other 8information regarding me in the possession of the Financial 9Institution, 10to the Illinois Department of Human Services or the Illinois 11Department of Healthcare and Family Services, or both ("the 12Department"), for the following purpose(s): 13to aid in the initial determination or re-determination by the 14State of Illinois of my eligibility for Medicaid long-term 15care benefits, pursuant to applicable law.  16I understand that this Consent and Authorization may be 17revoked by me in writing at any time before my financial 18records, as described above, are disclosed, and that this 19Consent and Authorization is valid until the Financial 20Institution receives my written revocation. This Consent and 21Authorization shall constitute valid authorization for the 22Department identified above to inspect all such financial   SB1777 Enrolled- 40 -LRB104 09558 JRC 19621 b1records set forth above, and to request and receive copies of 2such financial records from the Financial Institution (subject 3to such records search and reproduction reimbursement policies 4as the Financial Institution may have in place). An executed 5copy of this Consent and Authorization shall be sufficient and 6as good as the original and permission is hereby granted to 7honor a photostatic or electronic copy of this Consent and 8Authorization. Disclosure is strictly limited to the 9Department identified above and no other person or entity 10shall receive my financial records pursuant to this Consent 11and Authorization. By signing this form, I agree to indemnify 12and hold the Financial Institution harmless from any and all 13claims, demands, and losses, including reasonable attorneys 14fees and expenses, arising from or incurred in its reliance on 15this Consent and Authorization. As used herein, "Customer" 16shall mean "Member" if the Financial Institution is a credit 17union. 18....................... ...................... 19(Date)                  (Signature of Customer)              20                         ...................... 21                         ...................... 22                         (Address of Customer)  23                         ......................   SB1777 Enrolled- 41 -LRB104 09558 JRC 19621 b1                         (Customer's birth date) 2                         (month/day/year)  3The undersigned witness certifies that ................., 4known to me to be the same person whose name is subscribed as 5the customer to the foregoing Consent and Authorization, 6appeared before me and the notary public and acknowledged 7signing and delivering the instrument as his or her free and 8voluntary act for the uses and purposes therein set forth. I 9believe him or her to be of sound mind and memory. The 10undersigned witness also certifies that the witness is not an 11owner, operator, or relative of an owner or operator of a 12long-term care facility in which the customer is a patient or 13resident.  14Dated: ................. ...................... 15                         (Signature of Witness)  16                         ...................... 17                         (Print Name of Witness)  18                         ...................... 19                         ...................... 20                         (Address of Witness)  21State of Illinois)  SB1777 Enrolled- 42 -LRB104 09558 JRC 19621 b1                 ) ss.2County of .......) 3The undersigned, a notary public in and for the above county 4and state, certifies that .........., known to me to be the 5same person whose name is subscribed as the customer to the 6foregoing Consent and Authorization, appeared before me 7together with the witness, .........., in person and 8acknowledged signing and delivering the instrument as the free 9and voluntary act of the customer for the uses and purposes 10therein set forth.  11Dated:....................................................... 12Notary Public:............................................... 13My commission expires:.......................................  14        (b) In no event shall the credit union distribute the 15    member's financial records to the long-term care facility 16    from which the member seeks initial or continuing 17    residency or long-term care services.18        (c) A credit union providing financial records of a 19    member in good faith relying on a consent and 20    authorization executed and tendered in accordance with 21    this item (17) shall not be liable to the member or any 22    other person in relation to the credit union's disclosure 23    of the member's financial records to the Department. The   SB1777 Enrolled- 43 -LRB104 09558 JRC 19621 b1    member signing the consent and authorization shall 2    indemnify and hold the credit union harmless that relies 3    in good faith upon the consent and authorization and 4    incurs a loss because of such reliance. The credit union 5    recovering under this indemnification provision shall also 6    be entitled to reasonable attorney's fees and the expenses 7    of recovery.8        (d) A credit union shall be reimbursed by the member 9    for all costs reasonably necessary and directly incurred 10    in searching for, reproducing, and disclosing a member's 11    financial records required or requested to be produced 12    pursuant to any consent and authorization executed under 13    this item (17). The requested financial records shall be 14    delivered to the Department within 10 days after receiving 15    a properly executed consent and authorization or at the 16    earliest practicable time thereafter if the requested 17    records cannot be delivered within 10 days, but delivery 18    may be delayed until the final reimbursement of all costs 19    is received by the credit union. The credit union may 20    honor a photostatic or electronic copy of a properly 21    executed consent and authorization.22        (e) Nothing in this item (17) shall impair, abridge, 23    or abrogate the right of a member to:24            (1) directly disclose his or her financial records 25        to the Department or any other person; or26            (2) authorize his or her attorney or duly   SB1777 Enrolled- 44 -LRB104 09558 JRC 19621 b1        appointed agent to request and obtain the member's 2        financial records and disclose those financial records 3        to the Department.4        (f) For purposes of this item (17), "Department" means 5    the Department of Human Services and the Department of 6    Healthcare and Family Services or any successor 7    administrative agency of either agency. 8        (18) The furnishing of the financial records of a 9    member to an appropriate law enforcement authority, 10    without prior notice to or consent of the member, upon 11    written request of the law enforcement authority, when 12    reasonable suspicion of an imminent threat to the personal 13    security and safety of the member exists that necessitates 14    an expedited release of the member's financial records, as 15    determined by the law enforcement authority. The law 16    enforcement authority shall include a brief explanation of 17    the imminent threat to the member in its written request 18    to the credit union. The written request shall reflect 19    that it has been authorized by a supervisory or managerial 20    official of the law enforcement authority. The decision to 21    furnish the financial records of a member to a law 22    enforcement authority shall be made by a supervisory or 23    managerial official of the credit union. A credit union 24    providing information in accordance with this item (18) 25    shall not be liable to the member or any other person for 26    the disclosure of the information to the law enforcement   SB1777 Enrolled- 45 -LRB104 09558 JRC 19621 b1    authority. 2        (19) The furnishing of financial information to the 3    executor, executrix, administrator, or other lawful 4    representative of the estate of a member. 5    (c) Except as otherwise provided by this Act, a credit 6union may not disclose to any person, except to the member or 7his duly authorized agent, any financial records relating to 8that member of the credit union unless:9        (1) the member has authorized disclosure to the 10    person;11        (2) the financial records are disclosed in response to 12    a lawful subpoena, summons, warrant, citation to discover 13    assets, or court order that meets the requirements of 14    subparagraph (3)(d) of this Section; or15        (3) the credit union is attempting to collect an 16    obligation owed to the credit union and the credit union 17    complies with the provisions of Section 2I of the Consumer 18    Fraud and Deceptive Business Practices Act. 19    (d) A credit union shall disclose financial records under 20item (3)(c)(2) of this Section pursuant to a lawful subpoena, 21summons, warrant, citation to discover assets, or court order 22only after the credit union sends a copy of the subpoena, 23summons, warrant, citation to discover assets, or court order 24to the person establishing the relationship with the credit 25union, if living, and otherwise the person's personal 26representative, if known, at the person's last known address   SB1777 Enrolled- 46 -LRB104 09558 JRC 19621 b1by first class mail, postage prepaid, through a third-party 2commercial carrier or courier with delivery charge fully 3prepaid, by hand delivery, or by electronic delivery at an 4email address on file with the credit union (if the person 5establishing the relationship with the credit union has 6consented to receive electronic delivery and, if the person 7establishing the relationship with the credit union is a 8consumer, the person has consented under the consumer consent 9provisions set forth in Section 7001 of Title 15 of the United 10States Code), unless the credit union is specifically 11prohibited from notifying the person by order of court or by 12applicable State or federal law. In the case of a grand jury 13subpoena, a credit union shall not mail a copy of a subpoena to 14any person pursuant to this subsection if the subpoena was 15issued by a grand jury under the Statewide Grand Jury Act or 16notifying the person would constitute a violation of the 17federal Right to Financial Privacy Act of 1978. 18    (e)(1) Any officer or employee of a credit union who 19knowingly and willfully furnishes financial records in 20violation of this Section is guilty of a business offense and 21upon conviction thereof shall be fined not more than $1,000. 22    (2) Any person who knowingly and willfully induces or 23attempts to induce any officer or employee of a credit union to 24disclose financial records in violation of this Section is 25guilty of a business offense and upon conviction thereof shall 26be fined not more than $1,000.   SB1777 Enrolled- 47 -LRB104 09558 JRC 19621 b1    (f) A credit union shall be reimbursed for costs which are 2reasonably necessary and which have been directly incurred in 3searching for, reproducing or transporting books, papers, 4records or other data of a member required or requested to be 5produced pursuant to a lawful subpoena, summons, warrant, 6citation to discover assets, or court order. The Secretary and 7the Director may determine, by rule, the rates and conditions 8under which payment shall be made. Delivery of requested 9documents may be delayed until final reimbursement of all 10costs is received.11(Source: P.A. 101-81, eff. 7-12-19; 102-873, eff. 5-13-22.) 12    Section 20. The Illinois Trust and Payable on Death 13Accounts Act is amended by changing Section 4 as follows: 14    (205 ILCS 625/4)  (from Ch. 17, par. 2134)15    Sec. 4. Payable on Death Account Incidents. If one or more 16persons opening or holding an account sign an agreement with 17the institution providing that on the death of the last 18surviving person designated as holder the account shall be 19paid to or held by one or more designated beneficiaries, the 20account, and any balance therein which exists from time to 21time, shall be held as a payment on death account and unless 22otherwise agreed in writing between the person or persons 23opening or holding the account and the institution:24    (a) Any holder during his or her lifetime may change any of   SB1777 Enrolled- 48 -LRB104 09558 JRC 19621 b1the designated beneficiaries to own the account at the death 2of the last surviving holder without the knowledge or consent 3of any other holder or the designated beneficiaries by a 4written instrument accepted by the institution;5    (b) Any holder may make additional deposits to and 6withdraw any part or all of the account at any time without the 7knowledge or consent of any other holder or the designated 8beneficiaries to own the account at the death of the last 9surviving holder, subject to the bylaws and regulations of the 10institution, and all withdrawals shall constitute a revocation 11of the agreement as to the amount withdrawn; and12    (c) Upon the death of the last surviving holder of the 13account, the beneficiary designated to be the owner of the 14account (i) who is then living, if the beneficiary is a natural 15person, or (ii) that maintains a lawful existence under the 16state or federal authority pursuant to which it was organized, 17if the beneficiary is not a natural person, shall be the sole 18owner of the account. If , unless more than one beneficiary is 19so designated and then living or in existence, then in which 20case those beneficiaries shall hold the account in equal 21shares as tenants in common with no right of survivorship as 22between those beneficiaries; and .23    (d) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in subsection 24(c), any holder of the account may elect a per stirpes 25distribution option to the descendants of a natural person 26beneficiary if the beneficiary predeceases the last surviving   SB1777 Enrolled- 49 -LRB104 09558 JRC 19621 b1holder of the account. The institution may rely on the account 2holder's written representation of the identity of the 3descendants of each beneficiary living at the time of the 4beneficiary designation. The institution may also rely on an 5affidavit executed by a natural person beneficiary or 6descendant of a natural person beneficiary of the last 7surviving holder of the account upon or after the death of the 8account holder that identifies the descendants of any 9predeceased natural person beneficiary. The total percentage 10of the account to be distributed to all beneficiaries upon the 11death of the last surviving holder of the account must equal 12100%. If no beneficiary designated as the owner of the account 13on the death of the last surviving holder is then living or in 14existence, or if a per stirpes distribution has been selected 15and no descendant of a natural person beneficiary is then 16living, then the proceeds shall vest in the estate of the last 17surviving holder of the account.18(Source: P.A. 96-1151, eff. 7-21-10.) 19    Section 25. The Financial Institutions Electronic 20Documents and Digital Signature Act is amended by changing 21Section 10 as follows: 22    (205 ILCS 705/10)23    Sec. 10. Electronic documents; digital signatures; 24electronic notices.   SB1777 Enrolled- 50 -LRB104 09558 JRC 19621 b1    (a) Electronic documents. If in the regular course of 2business, a financial institution possesses, records, or 3generates any document, representation, image, substitute 4check, reproduction, or combination thereof, of any agreement, 5transaction, act, occurrence, or event by any electronic or 6computer-generated process that accurately reproduces, 7comprises, or records the agreement, transaction, act, 8occurrence, or event, the recording, comprising, or 9reproduction shall have the same force and effect under the 10laws of this State as one comprised, recorded, or created on 11paper or other tangible form by writing, typing, printing, or 12similar means.13    (b) Digital signatures. In any communication, 14acknowledgement, agreement, or contract between a financial 15institution and its customer, in which a signature is required 16or used, any party to the communication, acknowledgement, 17agreement, or contract may affix a signature by use of a 18digital signature, and the digital signature, when lawfully 19used by the person whose signature it purports to be, shall 20have the same force and effect as the use of a manual signature 21if it is unique to the person using it, is capable of 22verification, is under the sole control of the person using 23it, and is linked to data in such a manner that if the data are 24changed, the digital signature is invalidated. Nothing in this 25Section shall require any financial institution or customer to 26use or permit the use of a digital signature.  SB1777 Enrolled- 51 -LRB104 09558 JRC 19621 b1    (c) Electronic notices.2        (1) Consent to electronic records. If a statute, 3    regulation, or other rule of law requires that information 4    relating to a transaction or transactions in or affecting 5    intrastate commerce in this State be provided or made 6    available by a financial institution to a consumer in 7    writing, the use of an electronic record to provide or 8    make available that information satisfies the requirement 9    that the information be in writing if:10            (A) the consumer has affirmatively consented to 11        the use of an electronic record to provide or make 12        available that information and has not withdrawn 13        consent;14            (B) the consumer, prior to consenting, is provided 15        with a clear and conspicuous statement:16                (i) informing the consumer of:17                    (I) any right or option of the consumer to 18                have the record provided or made available on 19                paper or in nonelectronic form, and20                    (II) the right of the consumer to withdraw 21                the consent to have the record provided or 22                made available in an electronic form and of 23                any conditions, consequences (which may 24                include termination of the parties' 25                relationship), or fees in the event of a 26                withdrawal of consent;  SB1777 Enrolled- 52 -LRB104 09558 JRC 19621 b1                (ii) informing the consumer of whether the 2            consent applies:3                    (I) only to the particular transaction 4                that gave rise to the obligation to provide 5                the record, or6                    (II) to identified categories of records 7                that may be provided or made available during 8                the course of the parties' relationship;9                (iii) describing the procedures the consumer 10            must use to withdraw consent, as provided in 11            clause (i), and to update information needed to 12            contact the consumer electronically; and13                (iv) informing the consumer:14                    (I) how, after the consent, the consumer 15                may, upon request, obtain a paper copy of an 16                electronic record, and17                    (II) whether any fee will be charged for a 18                paper copy;19            (C) the consumer:20                (i) prior to consenting, is provided with a 21            statement of the hardware and software 22            requirements for access to and retention of the 23            electronic records; and24                (ii) consents electronically, or confirms his 25            or her consent electronically, in a manner that 26            reasonably demonstrates that the consumer can   SB1777 Enrolled- 53 -LRB104 09558 JRC 19621 b1            access information in the electronic form that 2            will be used to provide the information that is 3            the subject of the consent; and4            (D) after the consent of a consumer in accordance 5        with subparagraph (A), if a change in the hardware or 6        software requirements needed to access or retain 7        electronic records creates a material risk that the 8        consumer will not be able to access or retain a 9        subsequent electronic record that was the subject of 10        the consent, the person providing the electronic 11        record:12                (i) provides the consumer with a statement of:13                    (I) the revised hardware and software 14                requirements for access to and retention of 15                the electronic records, and16                    (II) the right to withdraw consent without 17                the imposition of any fees for the withdrawal 18                and without the imposition of any condition or 19                consequence that was not disclosed under 20                subparagraph (B)(i); and21                (ii) again complies with subparagraph (C).22        (2) Other rights.23            (A) Preservation of consumer protections. Nothing 24        in this subsection (c) affects the content or timing 25        of any disclosure or other record required to be 26        provided or made available to any consumer under any   SB1777 Enrolled- 54 -LRB104 09558 JRC 19621 b1        statute, regulation, or other rule of law.2            (B) Verification or acknowledgment. If a law that 3        was enacted prior to this amendatory Act of the 95th 4        General Assembly expressly requires a record to be 5        provided or made available by a specified method that 6        requires verification or acknowledgment of receipt, 7        the record may be provided or made available 8        electronically only if the method used provides the 9        required verification or acknowledgment of receipt.10        (2.5) Consent to electronic transactions given by the 11    customer pursuant to the federal Electronic Signatures in 12    Global and National Commerce Act, 15 U.S.C. 7001, shall 13    satisfy the consent requirements of this Act. 14        (3) Effect of failure to obtain electronic consent or 15    confirmation of consent. The legal effectiveness, 16    validity, or enforceability of any contract executed by a 17    consumer shall not be denied solely because of the failure 18    to obtain electronic consent or confirmation of consent by 19    that consumer in accordance with paragraph (1)(C)(ii).20        (4) Prospective effect. Withdrawal of consent by a 21    consumer shall not affect the legal effectiveness, 22    validity, or enforceability of electronic records provided 23    or made available to that consumer in accordance with 24    paragraph (1) prior to implementation of the consumer's 25    withdrawal of consent. A consumer's withdrawal of consent 26    shall be effective within a reasonable period of time   SB1777 Enrolled- 55 -LRB104 09558 JRC 19621 b1    after receipt of the withdrawal by the provider of the 2    record. Failure to comply with paragraph (1)(D) may, at 3    the election of the consumer, be treated as a withdrawal 4    of consent for purposes of this paragraph.5        (5) Prior consent. This subsection does not apply to 6    any records that are provided or made available to a 7    consumer who has consented prior to the effective date of 8    this amendatory Act of the 95th General Assembly to 9    receive the records in electronic form as permitted by any 10    statute, regulation, or other rule of law.11        (6) Oral communications. An oral communication or a 12    recording of an oral communication shall not qualify as an 13    electronic record for purposes of this subsection (c), 14    except as otherwise provided under applicable law. 15(Source: P.A. 94-458, eff. 8-4-05; 95-77, eff. 8-13-07.) 16    Section 30. The Probate Act of 1975 is amended by changing 17Sections 6-13, 6-15, and 9-3 as follows: 18    (755 ILCS 5/6-13)  (from Ch. 110 1/2, par. 6-13)19    Sec. 6-13. Who may act as executor. 20    (a) A person who has attained the age of 18 years, is a 21resident of the United States, is not of unsound mind, is not 22an adjudged person with a disability as defined in this Act, is 23not currently incarcerated in State or federal prison, and, 24except as provided in subsection (c), has not been convicted   SB1777 Enrolled- 56 -LRB104 09558 JRC 19621 b1of a felony is qualified to act as executor.2    (b) If a person named as executor in a will is not 3qualified to act at the time of admission of the will to 4probate but thereafter becomes qualified and files a petition 5for the issuance of letters, takes oath and gives bond as 6executor, the court may issue letters testamentary to him as 7co-executor with the executor who has qualified or if no 8executor has qualified the court may issue letters 9testamentary to him and revoke the letters of administration 10with the will annexed. The letters testamentary shall provide 11the names of each executor if co-executors are granted by the 12court. 13    (c) A person who has been convicted of a felony is 14qualified to act as an executor if: (i) the testator names that 15person as an executor and expressly acknowledges in the will 16that the testator is aware that the person has been convicted 17of a felony prior to the execution of the will or codicil; (ii) 18the person is not prohibited by law, including Sections 2-6, 192-6.2, and 2-6.6, from receiving a share of the testator's 20estate; (iii) the person was not previously convicted of 21financial exploitation of an elderly person or a person with a 22disability, financial identity theft, or a similar crime in 23another state or in federal court; and (iv) the person is 24otherwise qualified to act as an executor under subsection 25(a). 26    (d) The court may in its discretion require a nonresident   SB1777 Enrolled- 57 -LRB104 09558 JRC 19621 b1executor to furnish a bond in such amount and with such surety 2as the court determines notwithstanding any contrary provision 3of the will.4(Source: P.A. 103-280, eff. 1-1-24.) 5    (755 ILCS 5/6-15)  (from Ch. 110 1/2, par. 6-15)6    Sec. 6-15. Executor to administer all estate of decedent.) 7    (a) The executor or the administrator with the will 8annexed shall administer all the testate and intestate estate 9of the decedent.10    (b) Any person doing business or performing transactions 11on behalf of, or at the direction of, an executor, 12administrator, or administrator with the will annexed may rely 13on the powers of an independent representative under Section 1428-8 of this Act and the protections afforded to persons 15dealing with an independent representative under Section 28-9 16of this Act.17    The person shall confirm by examination of the letters 18testamentary, letters of administration, or letters of 19administration with the will annexed, or by examination of a 20document purporting to be the letters of office, that the 21letters were issued by the court solely to the executor or 22administrator. If the letters of office or a document 23purporting to be the letters of office provide for 24co-executors or co-administrators and either the person is 25unable to identify one or more of the co-executors or   SB1777 Enrolled- 58 -LRB104 09558 JRC 19621 b1co-administrators or cannot determine the lawful existence of 2any co-executor or co-administrator or if conflicting claims 3or directions are made by the co-executors or 4co-administrators, then the person may refuse to perform any 5transaction until the person receives a determination of the 6appropriate course of action by a court of appropriate 7jurisdiction. 8    (c) Any person, corporation, or financial institution that 9conducts business or performs transactions on behalf of, or at 10the direction of, an executor, administrator, or administrator 11with the will annexed is fully protected and released from 12liability if the person conducts business or performs 13transactions as directed by a court of appropriate 14jurisdiction as provided in subsection (b) or bases the 15presumption on the confirmation by examination of the letters 16testamentary, letters of administration, letters of 17administration with the will annexed, or a document purporting 18to be the letters of office as provided in subsection (b). 19(Source: P.A. 79-328.) 20    (755 ILCS 5/9-3)  (from Ch. 110 1/2, par. 9-3)21    Sec. 9-3. Persons entitled to preference in obtaining 22letters. The following persons are entitled to preference in 23the following order in obtaining the issuance of letters of 24administration and of administration with the will annexed:25    (a) The surviving spouse or any person nominated by the   SB1777 Enrolled- 59 -LRB104 09558 JRC 19621 b1surviving spouse.2    (b) The legatees or any person nominated by them, with 3preference to legatees who are children.4    (c) The children or any person nominated by them.5    (d) The grandchildren or any person nominated by them.6    (e) The parents or any person nominated by them.7    (f) The brothers and sisters or any person nominated by 8them.9    (g) The nearest kindred or any person nominated by them.10    (h) The representative of the estate of a deceased ward.11    (i) The Public Administrator.12    (j) A creditor of the estate.13    Only a person qualified to act as administrator under this 14Act may nominate, except that the guardian of the estate, if 15any, otherwise the guardian of the person, of a person who is 16not qualified to act as administrator solely because of 17minority or legal disability may nominate on behalf of the 18minor or person with a disability in accordance with the order 19of preference set forth in this Section. A person who has been 20removed as representative under this Act loses the right to 21name a successor.22    When several persons are claiming and are equally entitled 23to administer or to nominate an administrator, the court may 24grant letters to one or more of them or to the nominee of one 25or more of them. The letters shall provide the names of each 26administrator if co-administrators are granted by the court.   SB1777 Enrolled- 60 -LRB104 09558 JRC 19621 b1(Source: P.A. 99-143, eff. 7-27-15.)